Rhode Island, session 2025, SB970.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 34-4 of the General Laws entitled "Estates in Real Property" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
34-4-31. Prohibition of restrictive covenants related to grocery stores.
(a) A covenant or restriction concerning the use of land designated as a retail establishment
where fresh food is regularly and customarily sold in a bona fide manner for off-premises
consumption including, but not limited to, grocery stores and supermarkets, shall be void and
unenforceable, except under circumstances as set forth in subsection (b) of this section.
(b) The prohibition in this section shall not apply to covenants or restrictions on concerning
the use of land if all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The land subject to restriction has been used by the seller within the six (6) months
prior to the date of the agreement for the operation of a retail establishment for the sale of fresh
food for off-premises consumption including, but not limited to, a grocery store or supermarket
(hereafter known as the “discontinued site”);
(2) The seller has identified and purchased land to be used for the operation of a new retail
establishment for the sale of fresh food for off-premises consumption including, but not limited to,
a grocery store or supermarket (hereafter known as the “relocated store”);
(3) The relocated store is similar in size and scope of products sold when compared to the
discontinued site;
(4) The relocated store is located within one-half (1/2) mile of the discontinued site;

(5) Relocation and commencement of operations of the relocated store at the new site
occurs within one year following closure; and
(6) The restrictive covenant imposed on the discontinued site does not have a term in excess
of eighteen months from the date of closure.
(c) The prohibitions set forth in this section do not apply to restrictive covenants or other
agreements entered into prior to the effective date of this section.
(d) If any portion of this section is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
unlawful, such finding shall not affect any other portion of this section not specifically so found.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001922
========
LC001922 - Page 2 of 3